Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.300

Compelling attendance of witnesses and testimony—Penalty.

(1) The director may issue subpoenas, administer oaths and take testimony in all matters relating to the duties herein required, such testimony to be taken in some suitable place in the vicinity to which testimony is applicable.

(2) Witnesses subpoenaed and testifying before any officer of the department shall be paid the same fees as witnesses before a superior court, such payment to be made from the funds of the department.

(3) Any person duly subpoenaed under the provisions of this section who willfully neglects or refuses to attend or testify at the time and place named in the subpoena, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding thirty days.

[ 2003 c 53 s 227; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.300. Prior: 1901 c 74 s 4; RRS s 7589.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.